Utah statutes.
59-2-208.   Duties of commission and county auditors relative to mines.

The duties of the commission and county auditors relative to (1) the assessment of mines, mining claims, and mining property; (2) the statements and returns to be made; and (3) the equalization thereof are the same as those provided for the assessment of public utilities.



Enacted by Chapter 4, 1987 General Session

